Arkansas, session 2025, SB594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-3-201(b)(1), concerning exemptions from
the requirement of obtaining a certificate of public convenience and
necessity, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) This section does not:
(1) require Require a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for:
(A) The replacement or expansion of existing equipment or
facilities with similar equipment or facilities in substantially the same
location or the rebuilding, upgrading, modernizing, or reconstructing of
equipment or facilities that increase capacity if no increase in the width of
an existing right-of-way is required;
(B) The construction or operation of equipment or
facilities for supplying a public service that has begun under a limited or
*ANS429*
03/31/2025 4:20:33 PM ANS429

SB594
conditional certificate or authority as provided in §§ 23-3-203 — 23-3-205;
(C) The extension of a public service:
(i) Within a municipality or district where a public
service has been lawfully supplied;
(ii) Within or to territory then being served; or
(iii) That is necessary in the ordinary course; or
(D) Except as provided in § 23-18-504(c), the construction
or operation of a major utility facility as defined in the Utility Facility
Environmental and Economic Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq., or any
exemption under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection
Act, § 23-18-501 et seq.; or
(2) Apply to equipment or facilities a majority of which is
owned by one (1) or more exempt wholesale generators as defined in § 23-1-
101;






















03/31/2025 4:20:33 PM ANS429